Florida, session 2026, SB1168.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 58 59 Section 1.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 435.04, 60 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 61 435.04âLevel 2 screening standards.â 62 (2)âThe security background investigations under this 63 section must ensure that persons subject to this section have 64 not been arrested for and are awaiting final disposition of; 65 have not been found guilty of, regardless of adjudication, or 66 entered a plea of nolo contendere or guilty to; or have not been 67 adjudicated delinquent and the record has not been sealed or 68 expunged for, any offense prohibited under any of the following 69 provisions of state law or similar law of another jurisdiction: 70 (a)âSection 39.205, relating to the failure to report child 71 abuse, abandonment, or neglect. 72 (b)âSection 316.193(3)(c)3., relating to DUI manslaughter. 73 (c)âSection 393.135, relating to sexual misconduct with 74 certain developmentally disabled clients and reporting of such 75 sexual misconduct. 76 (d)(c)âSection 394.4593, relating to sexual misconduct with 77 certain mental health patients and reporting of such sexual 78 misconduct. 79 (e)(d)âSection 414.39, relating to fraud, if the offense 80 was a felony. 81 (f)(e)âSection 415.111, relating to adult abuse, neglect, 82 or exploitation of aged persons or disabled adults. 83 (g)âSection 741.28, relating to domestic violence. 84 (h)(f)âSection 777.04, relating to attempts, solicitation, 85 and conspiracy to commit an offense listed in this subsection. 86 (i)(g)âSection 782.04, relating to murder. 87 (j)(h)âSection 782.07, relating to manslaughter, aggravated 88 manslaughter of an elderly person or disabled adult, or 89 aggravated manslaughter of a child. 90 (k)(i)âSection 782.071, relating to vehicular homicide. 91 (l)(j)âSection 782.09, relating to killing of an unborn 92 child by injury to the mother. 93 (m)(k)âChapter 784, relating to assault, battery, and 94 culpable negligence, if the offense was a felony. 95 (n)(l)âSection 784.011, relating to assault, if the victim 96 of the offense was a minor. 97 (o)(m)âSection 784.021, relating to aggravated assault. 98 (p)(n)âSection 784.03, relating to battery, if the victim 99 of the offense was a minor. 100 (q)(o)âSection 784.045, relating to aggravated battery. 101 (r)(p)âSection 784.075, relating to battery on staff of a 102 detention or commitment facility or on a juvenile probation 103 officer. 104 (s)(q)âSection 787.01, relating to kidnapping. 105 (t)(r)âSection 787.02, relating to false imprisonment. 106 (u)(s)âSection 787.025, relating to luring or enticing a 107 child. 108 (v)(t)âSection 787.04(2), relating to taking, enticing, or 109 removing a child beyond the state limits with criminal intent 110 pending custody proceedings. 111 (w)(u)âSection 787.04(3), relating to carrying a child 112 beyond the state lines with criminal intent to avoid producing a 113 child at a custody hearing or delivering the child to the 114 designated person. 115 (x)(v)âSection 787.06, relating to human trafficking. 116 (y)(w)âSection 787.07, relating to human smuggling. 117 (z)(x)âSection 790.115(1), relating to exhibiting firearms 118 or weapons within 1,000 feet of a school. 119 (aa)(y)âSection 790.115(2)(b), relating to possessing an 120 electric weapon or device, destructive device, or other weapon 121 on school property. 122 (bb)(z)âSection 794.011, relating to sexual battery. 123 (cc)(aa)âFormer s. 794.041, relating to prohibited acts of 124 persons in familial or custodial authority. 125 (dd)(bb)âSection 794.05, relating to unlawful sexual 126 activity with certain minors. 127 (ee)(cc)âSection 794.08, relating to female genital 128 mutilation. 129 (ff)(dd)âChapter 796, relating to prostitution. 130 (gg)(ee)âSection 798.02, relating to lewd and lascivious 131 behavior. 132 (hh)(ff)âChapter 800, relating to lewdness and indecent 133 exposure and offenses against students by authority figures. 134 (ii)(gg)âSection 806.01, relating to arson. 135 (jj)(hh)âSection 810.02, relating to burglary. 136 (kk)(ii)âSection 810.14, relating to voyeurism, if the 137 offense is a felony. 138 (ll)(jj)âSection 810.145, relating to digital voyeurism, if 139 the offense is a felony. 140 (mm)(kk)âChapter 812, relating to theft, robbery, and 141 related crimes, if the offense is a felony. 142 (nn)âSection 815.04, relating to offenses against 143 intellectual property. 144 (oo)âSection 815.06, relating to offenses against users of 145 computers, computer systems, computer networks, and electronic 146 devices. 147 (pp)(ll)âSection 817.563, relating to fraudulent sale of 148 controlled substances, only if the offense was a felony. 149 (qq)(mm)âSection 825.102, relating to abuse, aggravated 150 abuse, or neglect of an elderly person or disabled adult. 151 (rr)(nn)âSection 825.1025, relating to lewd or lascivious 152 offenses committed upon or in the presence of an elderly person 153 or disabled adult. 154 (ss)(oo)âSection 825.103, relating to exploitation of an 155 elderly person or disabled adult, if the offense was a felony. 156 (tt)(pp)âSection 826.04, relating to incest. 157 (uu)(qq)âSection 827.03, relating to child abuse, 158 aggravated child abuse, or neglect of a child. 159 (vv)(rr)âSection 827.04, relating to contributing to the 160 delinquency or dependency of a child. 161 (ww)(ss)âFormer s. 827.05, relating to negligent treatment 162 of children. 163 (xx)(tt)âSection 827.071, relating to sexual performance by 164 a child. 165 (yy)âChapter 828, relating to animal cruelty. 166 (zz)âSection 831.29, relating to making or having 167 instruments and material for counterfeiting driver licenses or 168 identification cards. 169 (aaa)(uu)âSection 831.311, relating to the unlawful sale, 170 manufacture, alteration, delivery, uttering, or possession of 171 counterfeit-resistant prescription blanks for controlled 172 substances. 173 (bbb)âSection 836.05, relating to threats and extortion. 174 (ccc)(vv)âSection 836.10, relating to written or electronic 175 threats to kill, do bodily injury, or conduct a mass shooting or 176 an act of terrorism. 177 (ddd)âSection 838.015, relating to bribery. 178 (eee)(ww)âSection 843.01, relating to resisting arrest with 179 violence. 180 (fff)(xx)âSection 843.025, relating to depriving a law 181 enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation officer 182 means of protection or communication. 183 (ggg)(yy)âSection 843.12, relating to aiding in an escape. 184 (hhh)(zz)âSection 843.13, relating to aiding in the escape 185 of juvenile inmates in correctional institutions. 186 (iii)(aaa)âChapter 847, relating to obscene literature. 187 (jjj)(bbb)âSection 859.01, relating to poisoning food or 188 water. 189 (kkk)(ccc)âSection 873.01, relating to the prohibition on 190 the purchase or sale of human organs and tissue. 191 (lll)(ddd)âSection 874.05, relating to encouraging or 192 recruiting another to join a criminal gang. 193 (mmm)(eee)âChapter 893, relating to drug abuse prevention 194 and control, only if the offense was a felony or if any other 195 person involved in the offense was a minor. 196 (nnn)(fff)âSection 916.1075, relating to sexual misconduct 197 with certain forensic clients and reporting of such sexual 198 misconduct. 199 (ooo)(ggg)âSection 944.35(3), relating to inflicting cruel 200 or inhuman treatment on an inmate resulting in great bodily 201 harm. 202 (ppp)(hhh)âSection 944.40, relating to escape. 203 (qqq)(iii)âSection 944.46, relating to harboring, 204 concealing, or aiding an escaped prisoner. 205 (rrr)(jjj)âSection 944.47, relating to introduction of 206 contraband into a correctional facility. 207 (sss)âSection 951.22, relating to contraband articles in 208 county detention facilities. 209 (ttt)(kkk)âSection 985.701, relating to sexual misconduct 210 in juvenile justice programs. 211 (uuu)(lll)âSection 985.711, relating to contraband 212 introduced into detention facilities. 213 (3)âThe security background investigations under this 214 section must ensure that no person subject to this section has 215 been arrested for and is awaiting final disposition of, been 216 found guilty of, regardless of adjudication, or entered a plea 217 of nolo contendere or guilty to, any offense that constitutes 218 domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28, whether such act was 219 committed in this state or in another jurisdiction. 220 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 435.12, Florida 221 Statutes, is amended to read: 222 435.12âCare Provider Background Screening Clearinghouse.â 223 (1)âThe Agency for Health Care Administration in 224 consultation with the Department of Law Enforcement shall create 225 a secure web-based system, which shall be known as the âCare 226 Provider Background Screening Clearinghouseâ or âclearinghouse.â 227 The clearinghouse must allow the results of criminal history 228 checks provided to the specified agencies and, beginning January 229 1, 2026, or a later date as determined by the Agency for Health 230 Care Administration, to qualified entities participating in the 231 clearinghouse for screening of persons qualified as care 232 providers under s. 943.0542 to be shared among the specified 233 agencies and qualified entities when a person has applied to 234 volunteer, be employed, be licensed, enter into a contract, or 235 has an affiliation that allows or requires a state and national 236 fingerprint-based criminal history check. Beginning January 1, 237 2025, or a later date as determined by the Agency for Health 238 Care Administration, the Agency for Health Care Administration 239 shall review and determine eligibility for all criminal history 240 checks submitted to the clearinghouse for the Department of 241 Education. The clearinghouse shall share eligibility 242 determinations with the Department of Education and the 243 qualified entities. Beginning July 1, 2028, or as soon as 244 practicable thereafter as determined by the Agency for Health 245 Care Administration, the Agency for Health Care Administration 246 shall review and determine eligibility for all criminal history 247 checks submitted to the clearinghouse by specified agencies as 248 defined in s. 435.02. The clearinghouse shall share eligibility 249 determinations with the specified agencies. Each specified 250 agency and qualified entity is responsible for processing 251 exemptions from disqualification pursuant to s. 435.07. The 252 Agency for Health Care Administration and the Department of Law 253 Enforcement may adopt rules to create forms or implement 254 procedures needed to carry out this section. 255 Section 3.âThe amendments made by this act to s. 435.12(1), 256 Florida Statutes, must be implemented by July 1, 2028, or as 257 soon as practicable thereafter as determined by the Agency for 258 Health Care Administration. 259 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and paragraphs 260 (a), (b), and (d) of subsection (2) of section 943.0438, Florida 261 Statutes, are amended, and subsection (5) is added to that 262 section, to read: 263 943.0438âAthletic coaches for independent sanctioning 264 authorities.â 265 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 266 (a)ââAthletic coachâ means a person who: 267 1.âIs authorized by an independent sanctioning authority to 268 work as a coach, an assistant coach, a manager, or a referee, 269 whether for compensation or as a volunteer, for a youth athletic 270 team based in this state; and 271 2.âHas direct contact with one or more minors on the youth 272 athletic team. 273 (2)âAn independent sanctioning authority shall: 274 (a)âEffective July 1, 2026:, 275 1.âConduct a level 2 background screening under s. 435.04 276 of each current and prospective athletic coach. The authority 277 may not delegate this responsibility to an individual team and 278 may not authorize any person to act as an athletic coach unless 279 a level 2 background screening is conducted and does not result 280 in disqualification under subparagraph 3 paragraph (b). 281 2.(b)1.âBe considered a Before January 1, 2026, or a later 282 date as determined by the Agency for Health Care Administration 283 for the participation of qualified entity for purposes of 284 participating entities in the Care Provider Background Screening 285 Clearinghouse under s. 435.12, disqualify any person from acting 286 as an athletic coach as provided in s. 435.04. The authority may 287 allow a person disqualified under this subparagraph to act as an 288 athletic coach if it determines that the person meets the 289 requirements for an exemption from disqualification under s. 290 435.07. 291 3.2.âOn or after January 1, 2026, or a later date as 292 determined by the Agency for Health Care Administration, Not 293 allow a any person to act as an athletic coach if he or she does 294 not pass the background screening qualifications in s. 435.04. 295 The authority may allow a person disqualified under this 296 subparagraph to act as an athletic coach if the person has 297 successfully completed the exemption from the disqualification 298 process under s. 435.07. 299 (c)(d)âMaintain for at least 5 years documentation of: 300 1.âThe results for each person screened under subparagraph 301 (a)1. paragraph (a); and 302 2.âThe written notice of disqualification provided to each 303 person under paragraph (b) (c). 304 (5)âNotwithstanding paragraph (2)(a), a person who has not 305 undergone background screening pursuant to this section may act 306 as an athletic coach if he or she is under the direct 307 supervision of an athletic coach who meets the background 308 screening requirements of this section. 309 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) and subsection 310 (4) of section 943.0542, Florida Statutes, are amended, and 311 subsection (5) of that section is reenacted, to read: 312 943.0542âAccess to criminal history information provided by 313 the department to qualified entities.â 314 (2)(a)âA qualified entity conducting background criminal 315 history checks under this section must: 316 1.âRegister with the department before submitting a request 317 for screening under this section. Each such request must be 318 voluntary and conform to the requirements established in the 319 National Child Protection Act of 1993, as amended. As a part of 320 the registration, the qualified entity must agree to comply with 321 state and federal law and must so indicate by signing an 322 agreement approved by the department. The qualified entity shall 323 designate a user administrator to act as the primary point of 324 contact and to manage compliance with state and federal laws 325 regarding the security and privacy of criminal history 326 information. The qualified entity may designate additional 327 authorized users with delegated authority to manage or access 328 the system for the purpose of requesting and reviewing 329 background screening information pursuant to this section. The 330 department shall periodically audit qualified entities to ensure 331 compliance with federal law and this section. 332 2.âBefore January 1, 2026, or a later date as determined by 333 the Agency for Health Care Administration, submit to the 334 department, and effective January 1, 2026, or a later date as 335 determined by the Agency for Health Care Administration, submit 336 to the agency a request for screening an employee or volunteer 337 or person applying to be an employee or volunteer by submitting 338 fingerprints, or the request may be submitted electronically. 339 The qualified entity must maintain a signed waiver allowing the 340 release of the state and national criminal history record 341 information to the qualified entity. 342 (4)âThe national criminal history data is available to 343 qualified entities to use only for the purpose of screening 344 employees and volunteers or persons applying to be an employee 345 or volunteer with a qualified entity. Through December 31, 2026, 346 or a later date as determined by the Agency for Health Care 347 Administration, the department shall provide this national 348 criminal history record information directly to the qualified 349 entity as authorized by the written waiver required for 350 submission of a request. Effective January 1, 2026, or a later 351 date as determined by the Agency for Health Care Administration, 352 the Care Provider Background Screening Clearinghouse may provide 353 such record information to the qualified entity only if the 354 person requests an exemption from the qualified entity under s. 355 435.07. 356 (5)âThe entity making the determination regarding screening 357 shall apply the criteria under s. 435.04(2) to the state and 358 national criminal history record information received from the 359 department for those persons subject to screening. The 360 determination whether the criminal history record shows that the 361 employee or volunteer has not been arrested for and is awaiting 362 final disposition of, regardless of adjudication, or entered a 363 plea of nolo contendere or guilty to, or has been adjudicated 364 delinquent and the record has not been sealed or expunged for, 365 any offense listed under s. 435.02(2) shall be made by the 366 qualified entity through December 31, 2025, or a later date as 367 determined by the Agency for Health Care Administration. 368 Beginning January 1, 2026, or a later date as determined by the 369 Agency for Health Care Administration, the Agency for Health 370 Care Administration shall determine the eligibility of the 371 employee or volunteer of a qualified entity. This section does 372 not require the department to make such a determination on 373 behalf of any qualified entity. 374 Section 6.âParagraph (b) of subsection (6) of section 375 943.0585, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 376 943.0585âCourt-ordered expunction of criminal history 377 records.â 378 (6)âEFFECT OF EXPUNCTION ORDER.â 379 (b)âThe person who is the subject of a criminal history 380 record that is expunged under this section or under other 381 provisions of law, including former ss. 893.14, 901.33, and 382 943.058, may lawfully deny or fail to acknowledge the arrests 383 covered by the expunged record, except when the subject of the 384 record: 385 1.âIs a candidate for employment with a criminal justice 386 agency; 387 2.âIs a defendant in a criminal prosecution; 388 3.âConcurrently or subsequently petitions for relief under 389 this section, s. 943.0583, or s. 943.059; 390 4.âIs a candidate for admission to The Florida Bar; 391 5.âIs seeking to be employed or licensed by or to contract 392 with the Department of Children and Families, the Division of 393 Vocational Rehabilitation within the Department of Education, 394 the Agency for Health Care Administration, the Agency for 395 Persons with Disabilities, the Department of Health, the 396 Department of Elderly Affairs, or the Department of Juvenile 397 Justice or to be employed or used by such contractor or licensee 398 in a sensitive position having direct contact with children, the 399 disabled, or the elderly; 400 6.a.âIs seeking to be employed or licensed by, or contract 401 with, the Department of Education, any district unit under s. 402 1001.30, any special district unit under s. 1011.24, the Florida 403 School for the Deaf and the Blind under s. 1002.36, the Florida 404 Virtual School under s. 1002.37, any virtual instruction program 405 under s. 1002.45, any charter school under s. 1002.33, any hope 406 operator under s. 1002.333, any alternative school under s. 407 1008.341, any private or parochial school, or any local 408 governmental entity that licenses child care facilities; 409 b.âIs seeking to be employed or used by a contractor or 410 licensee under sub-subparagraph a.; or 411 c.âIs a person screened under s. 1012.467; 412 7.âIs seeking to be licensed by the Division of Insurance 413 Agent and Agency Services within the Department of Financial 414 Services; or 415 8.âIs seeking to be appointed as a guardian pursuant to s. 416 744.3125; or 417 9.âIs a person screened through the Care Provider 418 Background Screening Clearinghouse by a specified agency or 419 qualified entity pursuant to s. 435.12. 420 Section 7.âParagraph (b) of subsection (6) of section 421 943.059, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 422 943.059âCourt-ordered sealing of criminal history records.â 423 (6)âEFFECT OF ORDER.â 424 (b)âThe subject of the criminal history record sealed under 425 this section or under other provisions of law, including former 426 ss. 893.14, 901.33, and 943.058, may lawfully deny or fail to 427 acknowledge the arrests covered by the sealed record, except 428 when the subject of the record: 429 1.âIs a candidate for employment with a criminal justice 430 agency; 431 2.âIs a defendant in a criminal prosecution; 432 3.âConcurrently or subsequently petitions for relief under 433 this section, s. 943.0583, or s. 943.0585; 434 4.âIs a candidate for admission to The Florida Bar; 435 5.âIs seeking to be employed or licensed by or to contract 436 with the Department of Children and Families, the Division of 437 Vocational Rehabilitation within the Department of Education, 438 the Agency for Health Care Administration, the Agency for 439 Persons with Disabilities, the Department of Health, the 440 Department of Elderly Affairs, or the Department of Juvenile 441 Justice or to be employed or used by such contractor or licensee 442 in a sensitive position having direct contact with children, the 443 disabled, or the elderly; 444 6.a.âIs seeking to be employed or licensed by, or contract 445 with, the Department of Education, a district unit under s. 446 1001.30, a special district unit under s. 1011.24, the Florida 447 School for the Deaf and the Blind under s. 1002.36, the Florida 448 Virtual School under s. 1002.37, a virtual instruction program 449 under s. 1002.45, a charter school under s. 1002.33, a hope 450 operator under s. 1002.333, an alternative school under s. 451 1008.341, a private or parochial school, or a local governmental 452 entity that licenses child care facilities; 453 b.âIs seeking to be employed or used by a contractor or 454 licensee under sub-subparagraph a.; or 455 c.âIs a person screened under s. 1012.467; 456 7.âIs attempting to purchase a firearm from a licensed 457 importer, licensed manufacturer, or licensed dealer and is 458 subject to a criminal history check under state or federal law; 459 8.âIs seeking to be licensed by the Division of Insurance 460 Agent and Agency Services within the Department of Financial 461 Services; 462 9.âIs seeking to be appointed as a guardian pursuant to s. 463 744.3125; or 464 10.âIs seeking to be licensed by the Bureau of License 465 Issuance of the Division of Licensing within the Department of 466 Agriculture and Consumer Services to carry a concealed weapon or 467 concealed firearm. This subparagraph applies only in the 468 determination of an applicantâs eligibility under s. 790.06; or 469 11.âIs a person screened through the Care Provider 470 Background Screening Clearinghouse by a specified agency or 471 qualified entity pursuant to s. 435.12. 472 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 473 44.407, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 474 44.407âElder-focused dispute resolution process.â 475 (5)âQUALIFICATIONS FOR ELDERCARING COORDINATORS.â 476 (a)âThe court shall appoint qualified eldercaring 477 coordinators who: 478 1.âMeet one of the following professional requirements: 479 a.âAre licensed as a mental health professional under 480 chapter 491 and hold at least a masterâs degree in the 481 professional field of practice; 482 b.âAre licensed as a psychologist under chapter 490; 483 c.âAre licensed as a physician under chapter 458 or chapter 484 459; 485 d.âAre licensed as a nurse under chapter 464 and hold at 486 least a masterâs degree; 487 e.âAre certified by the Florida Supreme Court as a family 488 mediator and hold at least a masterâs degree; 489 f.âAre a member in good standing of The Florida Bar; or 490 g.âAre a professional guardian as defined in s. 744.102(17) 491 and hold at least a masterâs degree. 492 2.âHave completed all of the following: 493 a.âThree years of postlicensure or postcertification 494 practice; 495 b.âA family mediation training program certified by the 496 Florida Supreme Court; and 497 c.âAn eldercaring coordinator training program certified by 498 the Florida Supreme Court. The training must total at least 44 499 hours and must include advanced tactics for dispute resolution 500 of issues related to aging, illness, incapacity, or other 501 vulnerabilities associated with elders, as well as elder, 502 guardianship, and incapacity law and procedures and less 503 restrictive alternatives to guardianship; phases of eldercaring 504 coordination and the role and functions of an eldercaring 505 coordinator; the elderâs role within eldercaring coordination; 506 family dynamics related to eldercaring coordination; eldercaring 507 coordination skills and techniques; multicultural competence and 508 its use in eldercaring coordination; at least 6 hours of the 509 implications of elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation and other 510 safety issues pertinent to the training; at least 4 hours of 511 ethical considerations pertaining to the training; use of 512 technology within eldercaring coordination; and court-specific 513 eldercaring coordination procedures. Pending certification of a 514 training program by the Florida Supreme Court, the eldercaring 515 coordinator must document completion of training that satisfies 516 the hours and the elements prescribed in this sub-subparagraph. 517 3.âHave successfully passed a level 2 background screening 518 as provided in s. 435.04(2) and (3) or are exempt from 519 disqualification under s. 435.07. The prospective eldercaring 520 coordinator must submit a full set of fingerprints to the court 521 or to a vendor, entity, or agency authorized by s. 943.053(13). 522 The court, vendor, entity, or agency shall forward the 523 fingerprints to the Department of Law Enforcement for state 524 processing, and the Department of Law Enforcement shall forward 525 the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 526 national processing. The prospective eldercaring coordinator 527 shall pay the fees for state and federal fingerprint processing. 528 The state cost for fingerprint processing shall be as provided 529 in s. 943.053(3)(e) for records provided to persons or entities 530 other than those specified as exceptions therein. 531 4.âHave not been a respondent in a final order granting an 532 injunction for protection against domestic, dating, sexual, or 533 repeat violence or stalking or exploitation of an elder or a 534 disabled person. 535 5.âHave met any additional qualifications the court may 536 require to address issues specific to the parties. 537 Section 9.âSubsection (5) of section 501.9741, Florida 538 Statutes, is amended to read: 539 501.9741âAssisting in veteransâ benefits matters.â 540 (5)âBACKGROUND SCREENING.âA provider must ensure that all 541 individuals who directly assist a veteran in a veteransâ 542 benefits matter complete a level 2 background screening that 543 screens for any offenses identified in s. 408.809(4) or s. 544 435.04(2)(e), (f), or (ss) or (3) s. 435.04(2)(d), (e), or (oo) 545 or (4) before entering into any agreement with a veteran for 546 veteransâ benefits matters. An individual must submit a full set 547 of fingerprints to the Department of Law Enforcement or to a 548 vendor, entity, or agency authorized by s. 943.053(13), which 549 shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Law 550 Enforcement for state processing. The Department of Veteransâ 551 Affairs shall transmit the background screening results to the 552 provider, which results must indicate whether an individualâs 553 background screening contains any of the offenses listed in this 554 subsection. Fees for state and federal fingerprint processing 555 must be borne by the provider or individual. The state cost for 556 fingerprint processing is as provided in s. 943.053(3)(e). This 557 subsection does not imply endorsement, certification, or 558 regulation of providers by the Department of Veteransâ Affairs. 559 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 560 made by this act to section 435.04, Florida Statutes, in 561 references thereto, subsection (6) and paragraph (d) of 562 subsection (8) of section 397.487, Florida Statutes, are 563 reenacted to read: 564 397.487âVoluntary certification of recovery residences.â 565 (6)âAll owners, directors, and chief financial officers of 566 an applicant recovery residence are subject to level 2 567 background screening as provided under s. 408.809 and chapter 568 435. A recovery residence is ineligible for certification, and a 569 credentialing entity shall deny a recovery residenceâs 570 application, if any owner, director, or chief financial officer 571 has been found guilty of, or has entered a plea of guilty or 572 nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, any offense 573 listed in s. 408.809(4) or s. 435.04(2) unless the department 574 has issued an exemption under s. 435.07. Exemptions from 575 disqualification applicable to service provider personnel 576 pursuant to s. 397.4073 or s. 435.07 shall apply to this 577 subsection. In accordance with s. 435.04, the department shall 578 notify the credentialing agency of an ownerâs, directorâs, or 579 chief financial officerâs eligibility based on the results of 580 his or her background screening. 581 (8)âOnsite followup monitoring of a certified recovery 582 residence may be conducted by the credentialing entity to 583 determine continuing compliance with certification requirements. 584 The credentialing entity shall inspect each certified recovery 585 residence at least annually to ensure compliance. 586 (d)âIf any owner, director, or chief financial officer of a 587 certified recovery residence is arrested and awaiting 588 disposition for or found guilty of, or enters a plea of guilty 589 or nolo contendere to, regardless of whether adjudication is 590 withheld, any offense listed in s. 435.04(2) while acting in 591 that capacity, the certified recovery residence must immediately 592 remove the person from that position and notify the 593 credentialing entity within 3 business days after such removal. 594 The credentialing entity must revoke the certificate of 595 compliance of a certified recovery residence that fails to meet 596 these requirements. 597 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 598 made by this act to section 435.04, Florida Statutes, in 599 references thereto, subsection (5) and paragraph (b) of 600 subsection (6) of section 397.4871, Florida Statutes, are 601 reenacted to read: 602 397.4871âRecovery residence administrator certification.â 603 (5)âAll applicants are subject to level 2 background 604 screening as provided under chapter 435. An applicant is 605 ineligible, and a credentialing entity shall deny the 606 application, if the applicant has been found guilty of, or has 607 entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, regardless of 608 adjudication, any offense listed in s. 408.809 or s. 435.04(2) 609 unless the department has issued an exemption under s. 435.07. 610 Exemptions from disqualification applicable to service provider 611 personnel pursuant to s. 397.4073 or s. 435.07 shall apply to 612 this subsection. In accordance with s. 435.04, the department 613 shall notify the credentialing agency of the applicantâs 614 eligibility based on the results of his or her background 615 screening. 616 (6)âThe credentialing entity shall issue a certificate of 617 compliance upon approval of a personâs application. The 618 certification shall automatically terminate 1 year after 619 issuance if not renewed. 620 (b)âIf a certified recovery residence administrator of a 621 recovery residence is arrested and awaiting disposition for or 622 found guilty of, or enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere 623 to, regardless of whether adjudication is withheld, any offense 624 listed in s. 435.04(2) while acting in that capacity, the 625 certified recovery residence must immediately remove the person 626 from that position and notify the credentialing entity within 3 627 business days after such removal. The certified recovery 628 residence shall retain a certified recovery residence 629 administrator within 90 days after such removal. The 630 credentialing entity must revoke the certificate of compliance 631 of any recovery residence that fails to meet these requirements. 632 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 633 made by this act to section 435.04, Florida Statutes, in a 634 reference thereto, subsection (13) of section 409.913, Florida 635 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 636 409.913âOversight of the integrity of the Medicaid 637 program.âThe agency shall operate a program to oversee the 638 activities of Florida Medicaid recipients, and providers and 639 their representatives, to ensure that fraudulent and abusive 640 behavior and neglect of recipients occur to the minimum extent 641 possible, and to recover overpayments and impose sanctions as 642 appropriate. Each January 15, the agency and the Medicaid Fraud 643 Control Unit of the Department of Legal Affairs shall submit a 644 report to the Legislature documenting the effectiveness of the 645 stateâs efforts to control Medicaid fraud and abuse and to 646 recover Medicaid overpayments during the previous fiscal year. 647 The report must describe the number of cases opened and 648 investigated each year; the sources of the cases opened; the 649 disposition of the cases closed each year; the amount of 650 overpayments alleged in preliminary and final audit letters; the 651 number and amount of fines or penalties imposed; any reductions 652 in overpayment amounts negotiated in settlement agreements or by 653 other means; the amount of final agency determinations of 654 overpayments; the amount deducted from federal claiming as a 655 result of overpayments; the amount of overpayments recovered 656 each year; the amount of cost of investigation recovered each 657 year; the average length of time to collect from the time the 658 case was opened until the overpayment is paid in full; the 659 amount determined as uncollectible and the portion of the 660 uncollectible amount subsequently reclaimed from the Federal 661 Government; the number of providers, by type, that are 662 terminated from participation in the Medicaid program as a 663 result of fraud and abuse; and all costs associated with 664 discovering and prosecuting cases of Medicaid overpayments and 665 making recoveries in such cases. The report must also document 666 actions taken to prevent overpayments and the number of 667 providers prevented from enrolling in or reenrolling in the 668 Medicaid program as a result of documented Medicaid fraud and 669 abuse and must include policy recommendations necessary to 670 prevent or recover overpayments and changes necessary to prevent 671 and detect Medicaid fraud. All policy recommendations in the 672 report must include a detailed fiscal analysis, including, but 673 not limited to, implementation costs, estimated savings to the 674 Medicaid program, and the return on investment. The agency must 675 submit the policy recommendations and fiscal analyses in the 676 report to the appropriate estimating conference, pursuant to s. 677 216.137, by February 15 of each year. The agency and the 678 Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Department of Legal Affairs 679 each must include detailed unit-specific performance standards, 680 benchmarks, and metrics in the report, including projected cost 681 savings to the state Medicaid program during the following 682 fiscal year. 683 (13)âThe agency shall terminate participation of a Medicaid 684 provider in the Medicaid program and may seek civil remedies or 685 impose other administrative sanctions against a Medicaid 686 provider, if the provider or any principal, officer, director, 687 agent, managing employee, or affiliated person of the provider, 688 or any partner or shareholder having an ownership interest in 689 the provider equal to 5 percent or greater, has been convicted 690 of a criminal offense under federal law or the law of any state 691 relating to the practice of the providerâs profession, or a 692 criminal offense listed under s. 408.809(4), s. 409.907(10), or 693 s. 435.04(2). If the agency determines that the provider did not 694 participate or acquiesce in the offense, termination will not be 695 imposed. If the agency effects a termination under this 696 subsection, the agency shall take final agency action. 697 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 698 made by this act to section 435.04, Florida Statutes, in a 699 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 435.03, Florida 700 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 701 435.03âLevel 1 screening standards.â 702 (2)âAny person required by law to be screened pursuant to 703 this section must not have an arrest awaiting final disposition, 704 must not have been found guilty of, regardless of adjudication, 705 or entered a plea of nolo contendere or guilty to, and must not 706 have been adjudicated delinquent and the record has not been 707 sealed or expunged for, any offense prohibited under s. 708 435.04(2) or similar law of another jurisdiction. 709 Section 14.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 710 made by this act to section 435.04, Florida Statutes, in a 711 reference thereto, paragraph (j) of subsection (1) of section 712 1012.22, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 713 1012.22âPublic school personnel; powers and duties of the 714 district school board.âThe district school board shall: 715 (1)âDesignate positions to be filled, prescribe 716 qualifications for those positions, and provide for the 717 appointment, compensation, promotion, suspension, and dismissal 718 of employees as follows, subject to the requirements of this 719 chapter: 720 (j)âTemporary removal from the classroom.âThe district 721 school board shall adopt a policy temporarily removing 722 instructional personnel from the classroom within 24 hours after 723 a notification by law enforcement or a self-reporting employee 724 of his or her arrest for a felony offense or for a misdemeanor 725 offense listed in s. 435.04(2). 726 Section 15.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 727 made by this act to section 435.04, Florida Statutes, in a 728 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 1012.315, Florida 729 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 730 1012.315âScreening standards.â 731 (1)âA person is ineligible for educator certification or 732 employment in any position that requires direct contact with 733 students in a district school system, a charter school, or a 734 private school that participates in a state scholarship program 735 under chapter 1002, which includes being an owner or operator of 736 a private school that participates in a scholarship program 737 under chapter 1002, if the person: 738 (a)âIs on the disqualification list maintained by the 739 department under s. 1001.10(4)(b); 740 (b)âIs registered as a sex offender as described in 42 741 U.S.C. s. 9858f(c)(1)(C); 742 (c)âIs ineligible based on a security background 743 investigation under s. 435.04(2). The Agency for Health Care 744 Administration shall determine the eligibility of employees in 745 any position that requires direct contact with students in a 746 district school system, a charter school, or a private school 747 that participates in a state scholarship program under chapter 748 1002; 749 (d)âWould be ineligible for an exemption under s. 750 435.07(4)(c); or 751 (e)âHas been convicted or found guilty of, has had 752 adjudication withheld for, or has pled guilty or nolo contendere 753 to: 754 1.âAny criminal act committed in another state or under 755 federal law which, if committed in this state, constitutes a 756 disqualifying offense under s. 435.04(2). 757 2.âAny delinquent act committed in this state or any 758 delinquent or criminal act committed in another state or under 759 federal law which, if committed in this state, qualifies an 760 individual for inclusion on the Registered Juvenile Sex Offender 761 List under s. 943.0435(1)(h)1.d. 762 Section 16.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 763 made by this act to section 435.04, Florida Statutes, in a 764 reference thereto, section 1012.797, Florida Statutes, is 765 reenacted to read: 766 1012.797âNotification of certain charges against 767 employees.âNotwithstanding s. 985.04(7) or any other law to the 768 contrary, a law enforcement agency shall, within 48 hours, 769 notify the appropriate district school superintendent, charter 770 school governing board, private school owner or administrator, 771 president of the Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind, or 772 university lab schools director or principal, as applicable, 773 when its employee is arrested for a felony or a misdemeanor 774 involving an offense listed in s. 435.04(2), the abuse of a 775 minor child, or the sale or possession of a controlled 776 substance. The notification must include the specific charge for 777 which the employee of the school district was arrested. 778 Notwithstanding ss. 1012.31(3)(a)1. and 1012.796(4), within 24 779 hours after such notification, the school principal or designee 780 shall notify parents of enrolled students who had direct contact 781 with the employee and include, at a minimum, the name and 782 specific charges against the employee. 783 Section 17.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 784 made by this act to section 435.04, Florida Statutes, in a 785 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 1012.799, Florida 786 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 787 1012.799âReporting and self-reporting certain offenses.â 788 (2)âInstructional personnel and administrative personnel 789 shall self-report within 48 hours to a school district 790 authority, as determined by the district superintendent, any 791 arrest for a felony offense or for a misdemeanor offense listed 792 in s. 435.04(2). Such self-report is not considered an admission 793 of guilt and is not admissible for any purpose in any 794 proceeding, civil or criminal, administrative or judicial, 795 investigatory or adjudicatory. In addition, instructional 796 personnel and administrative personnel shall self-report any 797 conviction, finding of guilt, withholding of adjudication, 798 commitment to a pretrial diversion program, or entering of a 799 plea of guilty or nolo contendere for any criminal offense other 800 than a minor traffic violation within 48 hours after the final 801 judgment. When handling sealed and expunged records disclosed 802 under this rule, school districts must comply with the 803 confidentiality provisions of ss. 943.0585(4)(c) and 804 943.059(4)(c). 805 Section 18.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.